Wyoming, session 2025, HB0296.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1.

(a) The Legislature finds that:

HB0296

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0746
(i) The people of Wyoming did "ordain and
establish" the Wyoming Constitution (Wyoming Constitution,
Preamble);

(ii) The Wyoming Legislature derives its powers
from the Wyoming Constitution and its acts must be
conformable to it:

Legislatures…[are] Creatures of the Constitution;
they owe their existence to the Constitution:
they derive their powers from the Constitution:
it is their commission; and, therefore, all their
acts must be conformable to it, or else they will
be void. Moore v. Harper, 600 U.S. 1 (2023)
(internal citations omitted);

(iii) Article 20, Section 1 of the Wyoming
Constitution provides that the Wyoming Constitution may be
amended, and specifies in what manner;

(iv) The apportionment provisions of the Wyoming
Constitution "are quite clear, explicit and mandatory…[and]
leave no room for confusion or doubt as to what the
legislature is to do about reapportionment and when it is
to do it." (State ex rel. Whitehead v. Gage, 377 P.2d 299,
301 (Wyo. 1963));
HB0296

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0746

(v) Article 3, Section 3 of the Wyoming
Constitution provides in relevant part:

Each county shall constitute a senatorial
and representative district; the senate and house
of representatives shall be composed of members
elected by the legal voters of the counties
respectively, every two (2) years. They shall be
apportioned among the said counties as nearly as
may be according to the number of their
inhabitants. Each county shall have at least one
senator and one representative; but at no time
shall the number of members of the house of
representatives be less than twice nor greater
than three times the number of members of the
senate…. (Wyo. Const. Art. 3 sec. 3)

(vi) Article 3, Section 48 of the Wyoming
Constitution provides:

At the first budget session of the
legislature following the federal census, the
legislature shall reapportion its membership
based upon that census. Notwithstanding any other
provision of this article, any bill to apportion
the legislature may be introduced in a budget
session in the same manner as in a general
session. (Wyo. Const. Art. 3 sec. 48)

(vii) Since 1992 the Wyoming Legislature,
contrary to Wyoming's constitutional apportionment
provisions, has allowed for the creation of legislative
HB0296

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0746
districts that do not follow county lines and legislative
districts that do not have at least one (1) representative
and one (1) senator per county;

(viii) Apportionment for the Wyoming Legislature
must also conform with the Equal Protection Clause of the
14th Amendment under which the overriding objective is "that
the vote of any citizen is approximately equal in weight to
that of any other citizen in the State." (Reynolds v. Sims,
377 U.S. 533, 579 (1964));

(ix) Conformance to both the federal and state
constitutions may be best achieved with a legislature of
manageable size;

(x) No inconsistency exists between the
requirements of Wyoming Constitution Article 3, Sections 3
and 48 and those of the Equal Protection clause of the 14th
Amendment to the United States constitution and the Wyoming
Legislature must fully comply with both constitutions in
apportioning for legislative elections.

Section 2.
HB0296

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0746

(a) The Legislature further finds that:

(i) The Legislature shall make a good faith
effort to apportion itself as required by the 14th Amendment
in conformance with the principle that the vote of any
citizen is approximately equal in weight to that of any
other citizen in the State; and

(ii) The Legislature shall make a good faith
effort to apportion itself as required by Article 3,
Section 3 and 48 of the Wyoming Constitution by providing
for legislative districts that follow county lines and
legislative districts that have at least one (1)
representative and one (1) senator per county.

Section 3. The Management Council of the Wyoming
Legislature shall assign a committee of the Legislature to
study apportionment of the Legislature as provided by this
act during the 2025 interim. The assigned committee shall
conduct meetings in communities around Wyoming to take
input on apportionment options from members of the public
and other interested stakeholders. The committee shall
HB0296

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0746
report its findings to the Legislature not later than
December 1, 2025. The committee or Management Council may
introduce legislation to constitutionally apportion the
Legislature for introduction in the 2026 budget session of
the Wyoming Legislature.

Section 4. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0296